Utah statutes.
10-3b-105.   Municipal council in six-member council and five-member council
forms of government.
In a municipality operating under a six-member council form of government or a
five-member council form of government, the council:
(1)  is the legislative body of the municipality and exercises the legislative
powers and performs the legislative duties and functions of the municipality;
and
(2)  may:
(a)  adopt rules and regulations, not inconsistent with statute, for the
efficient administration, organization, operation, conduct, and business of
the municipality;
(b)  prescribe by resolution additional duties, powers, and responsibilities
for any elected or appointed municipal official, unless prohibited by statute;
(c)  require by ordinance that any or all appointed officers reside in the
municipality;
(d)  create any office that the council considers necessary for the government
of the municipality;
(e)  provide for filling a vacancy in an elective or appointive office;
(f)  take any action allowed under Section 10-8-84; and
(g)  perform any function specifically provided for by statute or necessarily
implied by law.
